Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-11,159
Behavioral health points of contact; designation; qualifications; behavioral health resources; access; coordination; report.

(1) On or before August 1, 2023, each school district shall designate one or more behavioral health points of contact for each school building or other division as determined by the school district. A behavioral health point of contact may be an administrator, a school nurse, a school psychologist, or another designated person affiliated with such school building or other division. Each behavioral health point of contact shall have knowledge of community behavioral health service providers and other resources available for students and families.

(2) On or before August 1, 2023, and on or before each August 1 thereafter, the State Department of Education, in consultation with the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, shall provide each school district with a registry of state and local behavioral health resources available to work with students and families by geographic area. The registry shall be updated at least annually and include resources for both school-based services and services accessible by students' families outside of school.

(3) Each behavioral health point of contact shall coordinate access to community behavioral health services for students and families and facilitate access to services during the school day at the school the student attends. Except as provided in section 43-2101, such facilitation shall be approved by the student's parent or guardian.

(4) Before the beginning of school year 2023-24, and before the beginning of each school year thereafter, each school district shall report the designated behavioral health points of contact to the State Department of Education.

Laws 2022, LB852, § 1.
July 21, 2022